California statutes. Elections Code
 developed by the Secretary of State, or a combined statement developed by the elections official that meets the requirements of this section, along with the instructions provided in this section for the completion of the statement, on the elections official’s internet website and shall provide the elections official’s mailing address, email address, and facsimile transmission number on the internet webpage containing the statement and instructions. The elections official shall accept the combined statement from a voter for the purpose of satisfying the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). An elections official may mail the combined statement to a voter pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) in lieu of the signature verification statement or unsigned ballot identification envelope statement.

(g) A local elections official offering other electronic means for submission of a
 statement described in this section shall establish appropriate privacy and security protocols that ensure that the information transmitted is received directly and securely by the elections official and is only used for the stated purposes of verifying the signature on the voter’s ballot.

(h) A ballot shall not be removed from its identification envelope until the time for processing ballots. A ballot shall not be rejected for cause after the identification envelope has been opened.

(i) For purposes of this section, “certification of the election” means the date the particular elections official submits a certified statement of the results of the election to the governing body pursuant to Section 15372, even if that occurs before the deadline to submit the certified statement of the election results set forth in Section 15372.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) For a regularly scheduled statewide election, “applicable notification deadline” means 14 calendar days after the election and “applicable receipt deadline” means 22 calendar days after the election.

(2) For an election that is not a regularly scheduled statewide election, “applicable notification deadline” means eight calendar days before certification of the election and “applicable receipt deadline” means two calendar days before certification of the election.

(k) In comparing signatures pursuant to this section, including when using signature verification software or other technology, an elections official shall adhere to all applicable regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

(l) An elections official is authorized to use contact information provided on a voter’s affidavit of registration to contact a voter for purposes consistent with this section.

(m) If an elections official establishes procedures that the official uses when comparing signatures pursuant to this section, the elections official shall post the procedures used on their internet website or provide them upon request at their office. In accordance with subdivision (k), any such procedures shall adhere to regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

(n) An elections official shall accept a form in satisfaction of the requirements of subdivision (d) or (e) if the form was developed by the Secretary of State or by an elections official pursuant to subdivision (d), (e), or (f). An elections official shall not accept a form
 created by any individual, organization, or entity other than the Secretary of State or an elections official.

(o) An elections official that places a vote by mail ballot drop box, as defined in Section 3025, at their office location to receive ballots, shall also use that drop box after the election in order to receive the form by which the voter provides a signature pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e), as applicable, provided that the drop box used after the election contains a clear and conspicuous label that it is to be used for this limited purpose and not for acceptance of late ballots.

(p) Notwithstanding Section 15 or any other law, if the last day for the performance of any act provided for or required by this section is a holiday, as defined in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the deadline to perform the act shall
 not be continued to the next business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 307, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 3)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3019.5.

(a) A county elections official shall establish a free access system that allows a vote by mail voter to learn if the voter’s vote by mail ballot was counted and, if not, the reason why the ballot was not counted. For each election, the elections official shall make the free access system available to a vote by mail voter upon completion of the official canvass and for 30 days after completion of the official canvass.

(b) For purposes of establishing the free access system for vote by mail ballots required by subdivision (a), a county elections official may use the free access system for provisional ballots established by the county pursuant to Section 302 of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 21082).

(c) If a county elections official elects not to mail a county voter information guide to a voter pursuant to Section 13305, the elections official shall use any savings achieved to offset the costs associated with establishing the free access system for vote by mail ballots required by subdivision (a).

(d) When a county elections official updates the county’s election management system or voter look-up tool on the county’s internet website with new voter information, the elections official shall provide the updated information to the Secretary of State to update the information that the Secretary of State provides to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 107.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3019.7.

(a) The Secretary of State shall maintain a system to allow a vote by mail voter to track the voter’s vote by mail ballot through the mail system and as the vote by mail ballot is processed by the county elections official. A county elections official shall use this system unless the county makes available to voters a different vote by mail ballot tracking system that meets or exceeds the level of service provided by the Secretary of State’s system. The system shall, at a minimum, be accessible to voters with disabilities and allow a voter to register to receive information via email or text message from the county elections official about the status of the voter’s vote by mail ballot, including all of the following information:

(1) A notification when the ballot has been delivered by the county elections official to the United States Postal Service.

(2) A notification of the date, based on information from the United States Postal Service, that the voter’s ballot is expected to be delivered to the voter.

(3) A notification if the voter’s ballot is returned as undeliverable to the county elections official by the United States Postal Service.

(4) A notification when the voter’s completed ballot has been received by the county elections official.

(5) A notification that the voter’s completed ballot has been counted, or, if
 the ballot cannot be counted, a notification of the reason why the ballot could not be counted and instructions of any steps that the voter can take in order to have the ballot counted. If the ballot cannot be counted because the voter’s signature did not compare or the identification envelope is missing a signature, as described in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 3019, and the voter has opted in to receive notifications by text or email, the notification shall include an internet website link to the required form for verifying or providing a signature, as applicable, and instructions for completion.

(6) A reminder of the deadline for the voter to return the voter’s ballot if the county elections official has not received a voter’s completed ballot by specified dates as determined by the county elections official.

(b) The Secretary of State shall make the system maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) available for use by each county. A county elections official may use the system for the purpose of complying with Section 3019.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 279, Sec. 3.   (AB 827)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3020.

(a) All vote by mail ballots cast under this division shall be received by the elections official from whom they were obtained or by the precinct board no later than the close of the polls on election day.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any vote by mail ballot cast under this division shall be timely cast if it is received by the voter’s elections official via the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company no later than seven days after election day and either of the following is satisfied:

(1) The ballot is postmarked on or before election day or is time stamped or date stamped by a bona fide
 private mail delivery company on or before election day, or it is otherwise indicated by the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company that the ballot was mailed on or before election day.

(2) If the ballot has no postmark, a postmark with no date, or an illegible postmark, and no other information is available from the United States Postal Service or the bona fide private mail delivery company to indicate the date on which the ballot was mailed, the vote by mail ballot identification envelope is date stamped by the elections official upon receipt of the vote by mail ballot from the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company, and is signed and dated pursuant to Section 3011 on or before election day.

(c) For purposes
 of this section, “bona fide private mail delivery company” means a courier service that is in the regular business of accepting a mail item, package, or parcel for the purpose of delivery to a person or entity whose address is specified on the item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 312, Sec. 5.   (AB 37)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3021.5.

(a) Upon the declaration of an out-of-state emergency by the Governor and the issuance of an executive order authorizing an out-of-state emergency worker to cast a ballot outside of their home precinct, a county elections official shall, upon request of an out-of-state emergency worker pursuant to this chapter, issue a vote by mail ballot to the out-of-state emergency worker using a process to be determined by that elections official. The process shall include all of the following:

(1) Authorization for a vote by mail ballot and accompanying voting materials to be sent to an out-of-state emergency worker by mail, facsimile transmission, or electronic transmission, as requested by the out-of-state emergency worker. An elections official may use reasonable facsimiles of the county voter information guides sent to voters as vote by mail ballots.

(2) A requirement that an out-of-state emergency worker mark the vote by mail ballot provided to
 them, place it in the vote by mail ballot identification envelope, and return the vote by mail ballot to the elections official from whom it was obtained. If no identification envelope is provided, the envelope used to return the vote by mail ballot to the elections official shall include the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 3011 and a statement signed under penalty of perjury that the voter is an out-of-state emergency worker.

(b) In order to be counted, a vote by mail ballot cast pursuant to this section shall be received in compliance with Section 3020.

(c) An elections official shall receive and canvass vote by mail ballots cast pursuant to this section by the same procedure as for all other vote by mail ballots cast pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 16.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3023.

Each ballot that is delivered pursuant to this chapter shall be accompanied by a state voter information guide, unless the voter has already been provided a state voter information guide. The state voter information guide shall display the Internet Web site address for a voter to check the status of his or her vote by mail or provisional ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (AB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3024.

The cost to administer vote by mail ballots where issues and elective offices related to school districts, as defined by Section 17519 of the Government Code, are included on a ballot election with noneducation issues and elective offices shall not be fully or partially prorated to a school district. The Commission on State Mandates shall delete school districts, county boards of education, and community college districts from the list of eligible claimants in the Parameters and Guidelines for the Absentee Ballot Mandates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Vote by mail ballot drop box” means a secure receptacle established by a county or city and county elections official whereby a voted vote by mail ballot may be returned to the elections official from whom it was obtained.

(2) “Vote by mail ballot drop-off location” means a location consisting of a secured vote by mail ballot drop box at which a voted vote by mail ballot may be returned to the elections official from whom it was obtained.

(b) On or before January 1, 2017, the Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations establishing guidelines based
 on best practices for security measures and procedures, including, but not limited to, chain of custody, pick-up times, proper labeling, and security of vote by mail ballot drop boxes, that a county elections official may use if the county elections official establishes one or more vote by mail ballot drop-off locations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 93.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.5.

(a) (1) A county that does not conduct an election pursuant to Section 4005 shall provide at least two vote by mail ballot drop-off locations within the jurisdiction where the election is held or at least one vote by mail ballot drop-off location for every 30,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more vote by mail ballot drop-off locations.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, at least one vote by mail ballot drop-off location shall be provided. The elections official shall make a
 reasonable effort to provide a vote by mail ballot drop-off location in the jurisdiction where the election is held.

(b) A vote by mail ballot drop-off location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All vote by mail ballot drop-off locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election.

(c) At least one vote by mail ballot drop-off location shall be an exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
 “vote by mail ballot drop-off location” has the same meaning as in Section 3025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 4.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3025.7.

(a) A county that conducts a statewide primary or statewide general election in accordance with Section 3025.5 or 4005 shall, in addition to the vote by mail ballot drop-off locations required by those sections, provide the following vote by mail ballot drop-off locations:

(1) The elections official shall designate one location on the main campus of each California State University within the official’s jurisdiction for an additional vote by mail ballot drop-off location.

(2) The elections official shall request that the governing body having jurisdiction over any University of California campus within the
 official’s jurisdiction authorize the use of one location on that campus for an additional vote by mail ballot drop-off location. The University of California is encouraged to comply with a request made under this paragraph.

(3) A county may, but is not required to, provide a vote by mail ballot drop-off location on a campus in accordance with this subdivision if the campus is not in session for its fall, winter, or spring term on the day of the election.

(b) When selecting ballot drop-off locations required by Section 3025.5 or 4005 for a statewide primary or statewide general election, the elections official shall give preference to locations on
 community college campuses that will be in session for the fall, winter, or spring term on the day of the election, and that have an annual enrollment of at least 10,000 students.

(c) A ballot drop-off location established in accordance with this section shall be accessible to voters with disabilities and shall comply with the general accessibility requirements described in Section 4005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 5.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3026.

(a) The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations establishing guidelines for county elections officials relating to the processing of vote by mail ballots.

(b) The Secretary of State shall evaluate the necessity for procedures that will protect voters’ personally identifying information from elections observers present during the signature comparison process specified in Section 3019. These procedures may be included in the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) The Secretary of State shall evaluate the cost and necessity of requiring an elections official to use information in the
 county’s election management system, or otherwise in the elections official’s possession, for the purpose of notifying a voter of the opportunity to verify a signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide a signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019. Based on this review, the Secretary of State may impose these requirements in regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.

(2) The Secretary of State shall evaluate the cost and necessity of requiring an elections official to send the additional written notices to voters specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of, and clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of, Section 3019. Based on this review, the Secretary of State may impose these requirements in regulations promulgated pursuant to this
 section.

(d) When promulgating or amending regulations pertaining to signature comparison pursuant to Section 3019, the Secretary of State shall consult with recognized elections experts, voter access and advocacy stakeholders, and local elections officials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   (SB 77)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Military and Overseas Voters Application and Voting Procedures [3101. - 3123.]

3101.

(a) The Secretary of State shall see that this chapter is enforced pursuant to Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.

(b) The Secretary of State shall make available to any person who qualifies as a military or overseas voter information regarding voter registration procedures for military or overseas voters and procedures for casting ballots by military or overseas voters.

(c) The elections official for each district shall ensure that their jurisdiction has available a system that would allow a
 military or overseas voter to electronically request
 a ballot and other information pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The Secretary of State shall develop standardized military or overseas voter voting materials as required by this chapter.

(e) The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form and content of a declaration for use by a military or overseas voter to swear or affirm specific representations pertaining to the voter’s identity, eligibility to vote, and status as a military or overseas voter, and shall further prescribe requirements for the timely and proper completion of a military or overseas voter’s ballot. The declaration shall be based on the declaration prescribed to accompany a federal write-in absentee ballot, as modified to be consistent with this chapter. The elections official for each jurisdiction shall
 ensure that a form for the execution of the declaration, including an
 indication of the date of execution of the declaration, is a prominent part of all balloting materials for which the declaration is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 18.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

(a) Any voter who qualifies as a military or overseas voter pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 300 shall have the right to register for, and to vote in, any election within the state, including any general, special, or primary election for any federal or statewide office or state ballot measure that is voted on statewide. Any voter who qualifies as a military or overseas voter pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 300 shall also have the right to register for, and to vote in, any other election for any office or ballot measure held in the precinct in which the voter was a resident when the voter was last living within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia, or, for a military or overseas voter
 qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, in any precinct of the state in which the voter’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(b) When a military or overseas voter
 registers to vote, the application shall be completed by the voter and shall contain the voter’s name; the voter’s date of birth; the address of the voter’s residence in the state when the voter was last living within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia or, if qualified as a military or overseas voter pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, the address of the voter’s parent or legal guardian when the parent or legal guardian was last living within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia; the address to which the ballot is to be sent; the voter’s political party preference or a statement that the voter declines to disclose a political party preference; and the voter’s signature.

(c) If an elections official receives a completed federal postcard application
 from a person qualified as a military or overseas voter, the application shall be deemed to be an affidavit of registration.

(d) If the applicant is not a resident of the county to which the applicant has applied, the elections official receiving an application from a military or overseas voter shall forward it immediately to the county in which the applicant resided when the applicant was last living within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia or, for a military or overseas voter qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, to the county in which the applicant’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(e) An application made pursuant to this section that is received by the elections official having jurisdiction over the election and deemed to be an affidavit of registration shall be effective only if it is postmarked on or before the 15th day prior to the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 19.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

Upon timely receipt of an application received pursuant to Section 3102, the elections official shall examine the application to ascertain that it is properly executed in accordance with this code. If the elections official is satisfied of this fact, the applicant shall be deemed a duly registered voter as of the date appearing on the application to the same extent and with the same effect as though he or she had registered in proper time prior to the election.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3101 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 5.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3104.

Applications for the ballots of military or overseas voters shall be received and, except as provided in Section 3106, the ballots shall be received and canvassed, at the same time and under the same procedure as vote by mail ballots, insofar as that procedure is not inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3102 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 7.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3105.

(a) Any application made pursuant to this chapter that is received by the elections official prior to the 60th day before the election shall be kept and processed on or after the 60th day before the election.

(b) (1) The elections official shall send the ballot not earlier than 60 days but not later than 45 days before the election
 and shall include with the ballot a list of all candidates who have qualified for the ballot and a list of all measures that are to be submitted to the voters and on which the voter is qualified to vote. The voter shall be entitled to write in the name of any specific candidate seeking nomination or election to any office listed on the ballot.

(2) The military or overseas voter may, in the alternative to the ballot provided pursuant to paragraph (1), use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote in any election in which the military or overseas voter is qualified to vote.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 15341 or any other provision of law, any name written upon a ballot for a particular office pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be counted for the office or
 nomination, providing the candidate whose name has been written on the ballot has, as of the date of the election, qualified to have his or her name placed on the ballot for the office, or has qualified as a write-in candidate for the office.

(d) Except as provided in Section 3106, the elections official shall receive and canvass military or overseas voter ballots described in this section under the same procedure as vote by mail ballots, insofar as that procedure is not inconsistent with this section.

(e) In the event that a military or overseas voter executes a ballot pursuant to this section and an application for a vote by mail ballot pursuant to Section 3102, the elections official shall
 process the application and the ballot in accordance with this chapter.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a military or overseas voter who qualifies pursuant to this chapter may, by facsimile transmission, register to vote and apply for a ballot pursuant to this section or a vote by mail ballot. Upon request, the elections official shall send the ballot to the qualified military or overseas voter either by mail, facsimile, or electronic transmission, as requested by the voter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3103 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 8.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.

(a) A military or overseas voter who is living outside of the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia, or is called for military service within the United States on or after the seventh day prior to the date of the election, may return their ballot by facsimile transmission. To be counted, the ballot returned by facsimile transmission shall be received by the voter’s elections official no later than the closing of the polls on election day and shall be accompanied by an identification envelope containing all of the information required by Section 3011 and an oath of voter declaration in substantially the following form: “OATH OF VOTERI,, acknowledge that by returning my votedballot by facsimile transmission I have waived my right to have my ballotkept secret. Nevertheless, I understand that, as with any vote by mailvoter, my signature, whether on this oath of voter form or my identificationenvelope, will be permanently separated from my voted ballot to maintainits
 secrecy at the outset of the tabulation process and thereafter.
My residence address (last U.S. residence for voter qualification purposes) is(Street Address)(City)(ZIP Code).
My current mailing address is(Street Address)(City)(ZIP Code).
My
 email address is _________________. My facsimile transmission
number is _________________.
I am a resident of __________ County, State of California, or am qualified 
as an elector pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321 of 
the Elections Code and I have not voted, nor intend to vote, a ballot from any other jurisdiction for the same
 election.
I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing is true and correct.
Dated this __________ day of ______, 20_____.
(Signature) (voter)(power of attorney cannot be accepted)
YOUR BALLOT CANNOT BE COUNTED UNLESS YOU SIGN THE
ABOVE OATH AND INCLUDE IT WITH YOUR BALLOT AND
IDENTIFICATION ENVELOPE, ALL OF WHICH ARE RETURNED
BY FACSIMILE TRANSMISSION.”

(b) Notwithstanding the voter’s waiver of the right to a secret ballot, each elections official shall adopt appropriate procedures to protect the secrecy of ballots returned by facsimile transmission.

(c) Upon receipt of a ballot returned by facsimile transmission, the elections official shall
 determine the voter’s eligibility to vote by comparing the signature on the return information with the signature on the voter’s affidavit of registration or any signature
 permitted for comparison under Section 3019. The ballot shall be duplicated and all materials preserved according to procedures set forth in this code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a military or overseas voter who is permitted to return their ballot by facsimile transmission is, nonetheless, encouraged to return their ballot by mail or in person if possible. A military or overseas voter should return a ballot by facsimile transmission only if doing so is necessary for the ballot to be received before the close of polls on election day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 20.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3107.

When the application is received by an elections official, other than a county elections official, the elections official receiving it shall, after the election, transmit it to the county elections official who, if the application is not subject to rejection, shall file the original. If an application is rejected, it shall be returned to the applicant with the reason for rejection endorsed on it, together with a new blank application.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3106 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 11.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3109.

If any military or overseas voter to whom a vote by mail ballot has been mailed and which ballot has not been voted by them returns to the county in which they are registered, or for a military or overseas voter qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, to the county in which the applicant’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia on or before election day, they may apply for a replacement ballot pursuant to Section 3014. The elections official shall then issue another vote by mail ballot to the voter, or the elections official shall certify to the precinct board that the voter is eligible to vote in the
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (AB 398)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3110.

If any military or overseas voter returns to the county of their residence, or for a military or overseas voter qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, to the county in which the applicant’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia, after the seventh day prior to the date of the election, they may appear before the elections official and make application for registration. The elections official shall register the voter, if the voter is not registered, and deliver to the voter a vote by mail ballot which may be voted in the
 elections official’s office or voted outside the elections official’s office on or before the close of the polls on the day of election and returned as are other vote by mail ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 21.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

If a military or overseas voter is unable to appear at their polling place because of being recalled to service after the seventh day prior to the date of the election, but before 5 p.m. on the day before the day of the election, they may appear before the elections official in the county in which the military or overseas voter is registered or, if within the state, in the county in which the voter is recalled to service. The elections official shall deliver to the voter a vote by mail ballot which may be voted in the elections official’s office or voted outside the elections official’s office on
 or before the close of the polls on the day of election and returned as are other vote by mail ballots. To be counted, the ballot shall be returned to the elections official’s office in person, by facsimile transmission, or by an authorized person on or before the close of the polls on the day of the election. If the military or overseas voter appears in the county in which the voter is recalled to service, rather than the county to which the voter is registered, the elections official shall coordinate with the elections official in the county in which the military or overseas voter is registered to provide the ballot that contains the appropriate measures and races for the precinct in which the military or overseas voter is registered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 161, Sec. 22.   (AB 2608)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

Whenever by any statute of the United States, provision is made for vote by mail, an application for a vote by mail ballot made under that law may be given the same effect as an application for a vote by mail ballot made under this code.

If, by any federal statute, provision is made for the transmission of applications for vote by mail status to the Secretary of State, he or she shall transmit the applications to the county elections official of the county in which the applicant claims residence, or for a military or overseas voter qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, to the county in which the applicant’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent
 or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3111 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 16.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3113.

If by any act of Congress which is now or may become effective during the effective period of this section, provision is made for voting by military or overseas voters, that act shall control and be superior to any conflicting provisions of this code, and all state, county, municipal, and district officers who are charged with the performance of duties with reference to the election laws of this state shall perform the duties and discharge the obligations placed upon them by that act of Congress. It is the purpose and intent of this section that full effect shall be given to ballots cast by military or overseas voters under federal statutes in order that no person shall be deprived of his or her vote by virtue of having cast his
 or her ballot under any federal statute rather than under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3112 by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 17.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3114.

(a) For an election for which this state has not received a waiver pursuant to the federal Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20301 et seq.), not sooner than 60 days but not later than 45 days before the election, the elections official shall transmit a ballot and balloting materials to each military or overseas voter who, by that date, submits a valid ballot application pursuant to Section 3102.

(b) If a valid ballot application from a military or overseas voter arrives after the 45th day before the election, the elections official charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials to that voter shall transmit them to the voter as soon as practicable after the application arrives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 94.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3116.

A military or overseas voter may use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote for all offices and ballot measures described in subdivision (a) of Section 3102.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 744, Sec. 19.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3116.5.

(a) A county elections official shall permit a military or overseas voter to cast his or her ballot using a certified remote accessible vote by mail system.

(b) This section does not apply to a county when conducting an all-mailed ballot election pursuant to Section 4005.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020, or one year after the date on which the Secretary of State certifies a remote accessible vote by mail system pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 19280) of Division 19, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 906, Sec. 3.   (AB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative on or after January 1, 2020, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3117.

A valid ballot cast shall be counted if it is received by the elections official in accordance with Section 3020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 618, Sec. 2.   (SB 29)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3118.
